Tennessee, session 114, HB0858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall use existing
departmental resources to conduct a study on the ease of access for patients and prescribing
practitioners to insurers' online processes to request step therapy exceptions pursuant to § 56-
7-3502(a). The purpose of the study is to determine whether insurers in this state are
complying with the requirement of § 56-7-3502(a) in a manner that is easily accessible by the
average patient or prescribing practitioner and does not impose any unnecessary barriers to
making an exception request. The commissioner shall deliver the commissioner's findings from
the study and any legislative recommendations to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of
the house of representatives, and the legislative librarian no later than December 15, 2025. The
commissioner may deliver such findings and recommendations by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0858
002897
- 1 -